Hawaii statutes.
[PART V.]
SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT SURCHARGE

§342G-61 Solid waste collection surcharge.
Each county may assess residential real property owners in their respective
county an annual solid waste collection surcharge based on the partial costs of
solid waste collection. Notice of this surcharge shall be included with the
notice of assessment required by county ordinance. [L 1993, c 312, pt of §2; am
L 2016, c 52, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next